Arkansas, session 2025, HB2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Towing and
Recovery Reform and Efficiency Act of 2025”.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-50-1202, concerning definitions related
to the removal or immobilization of unattended or abandoned vehicles, is
amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(17) “Cargo” means goods and materials transported by a motor
carrier, as defined under 49 C.F.R. § 390.5, as it existed on January 1,
*ZRC135*
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
2025, including without limitation:
(A) A pallet;
(B) A container;
(C) Bracing;
(D) An air pillow;
(E) A tie-down assembly or other securement system;
(F) A cradle;
(G) A chock; and
(H) Any other dunnage or packing; and
(18)(A) “Towing services” means to tow, recover, upright,
transport, repossess, immobilize, store, or otherwise facilitate the movement
or storage of vehicles on or off of a road, street, or highway.
(B) “Towing services” includes the solicitation of towing
services and the incidental labor, services, and equipment necessary for on-
road or off-road recovery and cleanup for work actually performed by the tow
business.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-50-1203(a) and (b), concerning the
creation of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board, are amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) There is hereby created the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board
consisting of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the
Senate, who shall serve terms of three (3) years.
(2)(A) Five (5) members shall be appointed from the towing
industry and shall be: Three (3) members shall be actively engaged in
business in the towing industry, licensed by the board, and appointed from
the state at large
(i) Licensed by the board to engage in nonconsent
towing; and
(ii) Appointed from the state at large.
(B) One (1) member who is permitted to engage in
repossession of vehicles using a tow vehicle shall be appointed from the
state at large shall be the Director of the Division of the Arkansas State
Police or his or her designee.
(C)(i) Two (2) members who are not associated with the
towing industry shall be appointed from the state at large One (1) member
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
shall be a current or former municipal chief of police or current or former
county sheriff with knowledge of the towing industry.
(ii) A member appointed under subdivision
(a)(2)(C)(i) of this section may designate a member of his or her staff with
knowledge of the towing industry to act on his or her behalf at any meeting
of the board.
(D) One (1) member shall be appointed from the commercial
trucking insurance industry.
(E) One (1) member shall be appointed from the trucking
industry.
(F) One (1) member shall have no affiliation with the
towing industry and shall serve as a representative of consumers of towing
services.
(G) One (1) member shall be a currently employed or
retired person with at least five (5) years of experience responding to fire
and emergency response incidents.
(b)(1) The appointed board members shall be residents of the State of
Arkansas at the time of appointment and throughout their terms.
(2)(A) A member appointed under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section shall remain licensed and engaged in the business of nonconsent
towing.
(B) A member appointed under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this
section shall be engaged in the business of vehicle repossession using a tow
vehicle.
(C) A member appointed under subdivision (a)(2)(D) of this
section shall remain actively engaged in the insurance industry.
(D) A member appointed under subdivision (a)(2)(A),
subdivision (a)(2)(B), or subdivision (a)(2)(D) of this section who no longer
satisfies the requirements for his or her board position under subdivision
(b)(2)(A), subdivision (b)(2)(B), or subdivision (b)(2)(C) of this section
shall:
(i) Provide notification of his or her change of
status to the Governor and the Director of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery
Board; and
(ii) Resign from the board within thirty (30) days
of the date upon which the member no longer satisfies the requirements of
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
subdivision (b)(2)(A), subdivision (b)(2)(B), or subdivision (b)(2)(C) of
this section immediately.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-50-1208(a)(2), concerning a possessory
lien on an unattended or abandoned vehicle held by a towing and storage firm,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(D)(i) A possessory lien under this section shall not
extend to:
(a) Cargo, if the owner of the cargo or his or
her authorized representative pays a fee not to exceed twenty percent (20%)
of the invoice for the towing and storing services to the towing and storage
firm; or
(b) Except for items to which a possessory
lien under this section shall not extend under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this
section, the contents of a personal vehicle if the owner of the personal
vehicle or his or her authorized representative pays a fee not to exceed five
percent (5%) of the invoice for the towing and storing services to the towing
and storage firm.
(ii) When making a payment of a fee under
subdivision (a)(2)(D)(i) of this section, the owner of the cargo or the
contents of a personal vehicle or his or her authorized representative shall
provide the towing and storage firm with an assurance of future financial
responsibility for the total invoice amount for the towing and storage
services for the motor vehicle from which the cargo or the contents of a
personal vehicle are taken.
(iii)(a) An owner of the cargo or the contents of a
personal vehicle or his or her authorized representative who has paid a fee
under subdivision (a)(2)(D)(i) of this section shall not be required to pay
the total invoice amount for the towing and storing services before the
release of the cargo or the contents of a personal vehicle.
(b) This subdivision (a)(2)(D) does not
prohibit a towing and storage firm from collecting the total invoice amount
for towing and storage services from the owner or lienholder or perfecting
the possessory lien under this section.
(c) Upon the payment of a fee under
subdivision (a)(2)(D)(i) of this section, the owner of the cargo or the
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
contents of a personal vehicle shall be credited the amount paid toward the
total invoice amount for the towing and storing services.
(iv) An owner of the cargo or the contents of a
personal vehicle or his or her authorized representative shall ensure that
the entity retrieving the cargo or the contents of a personal vehicle from a
towing and storage firm is insured and is liable for any damage that may
occur at the business location of the towing and storage firm as a result of
the retrieval of the cargo or the contents of a personal vehicle.
(v) If a motor vehicle is towed due to a police-
initiated tow and there is no dispute as to the fees assessed by the
authorized towing and storage firm:
(a) The owner or operator of the vehicle or
his or her authorized representative shall pay the authorized towing and
storage firm's invoice; and
(b) The authorized towing and storage company
shall release the motor vehicle and any cargo immediately.
(vi) If a motor vehicle is towed due to a police-
initiated tow and there is a genuine dispute as to the reasonableness of
amount of the fees assessed by the authorized towing and storage company, the
authorized towing and storage company shall release the cargo immediately to
the owner or the owner's designee in accordance with this subsection upon the
submission of:
(a) If the cargo does not belong to the
transportation company, proof of ownership of the cargo; or
(b) If the cargo belongs to the transportation
company:
(1) A letter from the vehicle owner's
insurance company stating that there is coverage for the relevant claim or
accident that includes without limitation a claim number, a policy number,
and the policy limits; or
(2) If the transportation company does
not have an insurance policy sufficient to cover the cost of the cargo clean-
up, a signed letter of guarantee from the transportation company.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-50-1218, concerning the consumer
complaint process with the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board, is amended to
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) A towing and storage company shall display notice of the
complaint process as provided for under subdivision (e)(2) of this section.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, notice of the complaint process
provided for under this section shall be:
(A) In the form provided in subdivision (e)(3) of this
section or as modified by the board; and
(B) Prominently printed in bold letters at the bottom of
each invoice for towing services.
(3) Notice of the complaint process required under this section
shall:
(A) Include without limitation:
(i) A statement that a complaint may be filed with
the board under this section;
(ii) The telephone number of the board; and
(iii) The website of the board; and
(B) Be substantially in the following form:
"COMPLAINTS: A PERSON DAMAGED OR OVERCHARGED MAY FILE
A COMPLAINT UNDER ARKANSAS CODE § 27-50-1218 WITH THE ARKANSAS TOWING AND
RECOVERY BOARD, (501) 682-3801, www.artowing.arkansas.gov".

SECTION 6. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Transition provisions
— Appointment of members of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board.
(a) The current members at the time of the effective date of this act
of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board are removed, and the Governor shall
appoint all board member positions, subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(b) Until at least seven (7) members of the board are appointed and
confirmed by the Senate, the Director of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery
Board, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing, shall exercise the powers and duties assigned to the board, except
that the hearing and adjudication of a complaint filed with the board shall
be continued until a quorum of the newly constituted board is assembled to
hear and adjudicate the complaint.

SECTION 7. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Transition Provisions
- Initial terms of members of the Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board.
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
(a) The initial term of the three (3) members of the Arkansas Towing
and Recovery Board who are actively engaged in business in the towing
industry, licensed by the board, and appointed from the state at large shall
expire on July 1 of 2026, 2027, and 2028, respectively.
(b) The term of the member of the board who is the Director of the
Division of the Arkansas State Police or his or her designee shall be for the
duration of time of his or her appointment as Director of the Division of the
Arkansas State Police.
(c) The initial term of the member of the board who is a current or
former municipal chief of police or current or former county sheriff with
knowledge of the towing industry shall expire on July 1, 2028.
(d) The initial term of the member of the board who is appointed from
the commercial trucking insurance industry shall expire on July 1, 2027.
(e) The initial term of the member of the board who is appointed from
the trucking industry shall expire on July 1, 2028.
(f) The initial term of the member of the board who has no affiliation
with the towing industry and who serves as a representative of consumers of
towing services shall expire on July 1, 2026.
(g) The initial term of the member of the board who is a currently
employed or retired person with at least five (5) years of experience
responding to fire and emergency response incidents shall expire on July 1,
2027.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an urgent need exists to enact
towing industry reforms, improve towing industry regulation and enforcement,
and provide statewide efficiencies to state and local law enforcement; and
that this act will accomplish these objectives and is immediately necessary
to protect consumers from illegal, fraudulent, and unauthorized towing
practices. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the
expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill;
or
04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135

HB2001
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden,
the date the last house overrides the veto.


































04/07/2025 4:31:07 PM ZRC135